Hawaii statutes.
§710-1067 Corroboration. In any
prosecution under this part, except a prosecution based upon inconsistent
statements pursuant to section 710-1065, falsity of a statement may not be
established solely through contradiction by the testimony of a single witness.
[L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §710-1067

This section forbids convictions for perjury based solely
upon the contradictory testimony of a single witness. Either some additional
corroborating evidence or the contradictory testimony of an additional witness
is needed for conviction.

The rationale for this rule is that the requirement is
necessary as a safeguard to induce witnesses to testify freely.[1] Obtaining
voluntary testimony in any proceeding would be difficult if the witness might
be harassed upon the word of a disappointed litigant.[2] And if the witness
were required to testify, it would seem that similar protection ought to be
given the witness.

The policy question to be decided, then, is whether the
overall protection and encouragement of persons who give statements (in the
contexts specified by the offenses in this part) is worth foregoing
occasionally the conviction of an apparent falsifier. The Code takes the
position that it is. There is also an additional safeguard involved in
protecting the innocent person. The protection rests upon the argument that
since equally honest persons may well have different recollections of the same
events, a conviction for a falsification offense ought not to rest upon the
contradiction of two statements. Otherwise, an innocent person would be
subject to prosecution every time another person, under oath, disputed the
innocent person's recollection.[3]

This section would apply only to a relatively narrow class of
cases which would not often be prosecuted. The section operates only where
there is no evidence but the testimony of a single contradicting witness.
Hence, one may view this section as a special gloss on the requirement of proof
beyond a reasonable doubt, equivalent to stating that no case of a
contradicting statement under oath, without more, can satisfy the general
requirement of proof beyond a reasonable doubt in falsification cases.[4]

The Hawaii case law is that a person accused of perjury may
be convicted only upon the testimony of two credible witnesses, or of one
credible witness corroborated by other evidence sufficient to satisfy the trier
of fact, beyond a reasonable doubt, as to the guilt of the accused.[5] Here,
the Code is essentially in accord with the Hawaii rule, but codifies it, lends
it greater clarity, and extends it to all falsification offenses in this part.

__________

§710-1067 Commentary:

1. See United States v. Weiler, 323 U.S. 606 (1944).

2. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code §4920, comments at 402.

3. See Weiler, supra.

4. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 403.

5. See Territory of Hawaii v. Shite, 43 Haw. 203 (1957).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next